tests/verbs-TAD.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../unm.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../unm.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch13) tv.aa.dir p1.sg":
    mil<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nemila
    mil<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nemilaok
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nulhala
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nulhalaok
    new<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : neyo
    new<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : neyook

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch14) tv.aa.dir p1.sg":
    ahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : ntahola    #If problems, check these verb paradigms
    ahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : ntaholaok  #There are many corrections written in
    pesh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : mpëshëwa # "This form written in above"
    pesh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : mpeshaok 

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch13) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    mil<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kemila
    mil<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kemilaok
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kulhala
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kulhalaok
    new<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : keneyo
    new<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : keneyook

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch14) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    ahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : ktahola
    ahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : ktaholaok
    pesh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kpesha
    pesh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kpeshaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch13) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    mil<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : mwilao
    mil<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : mwilaok
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : welahëlao #"e" and "ë" replaced crossed out "a"
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : welahëlaok
    new<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : weneyoo
    new<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : weneyook

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch14) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    ahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : toholao
    ahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : toholaok
    pesh<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : pweshao
    pesh<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : pweshaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch13) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    mil<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nemilawena
    mil<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nemilawenanak
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nulhalawena
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nulhalawenanak
    new<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : neyowena
    new<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : neyowenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch14) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    ahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : ntaholawena    
    ahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : ntaholawenak
    pesh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : mpeshawena
    pesh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : mpeshawanak 

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch13) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    mil<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kemilawena
    mil<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kemilawenanak
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kulhalawena
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kulhalawenanak
    new<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : keneyowena
    new<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : keneyowenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch14) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    ahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : ktaholawena
    ahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : ktaholawanak
    pesh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kpeshawena
    pesh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kpeshawanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch13) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    mil<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kemilawa
    mil<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kemilawaok
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kulhalawa
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kulhalawaok
    new<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : keneyowa
    new<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : keneyowaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch14) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    ahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : ktaholawa
    ahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : ktaholawnaok
    pesh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kpeshawa
    pesh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kpeshawnaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch13) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    mil<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : mwilawoo
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : welahëlawoo
    new<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : weneyook

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch14) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    ahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : toholkuwoo
    pesh<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : pweshawoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) tv.aa.dir p1.sg":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : newichema
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : newichemaok
    xam<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : ntaxama
    xam<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : ntaxamaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kewichema
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kewichemaok
    xam<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : ktaxama
    xam<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : ktaxamaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : wichemao
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : wichemaok
    xam<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : toxamao
    xam<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : toxamaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : newichemawena   
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : newichemawenanak
    xam<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : ntaxamawena
    xam<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : ntaxamawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kewichemawena
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kewichemawenanak
    xam<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : ktaxamawena
    xam<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : ktaxamawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kewichemawa
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kewichemawaok
    xam<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : ktaxamawa
    xam<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : ktaxamawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : wichemawao
    xam<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : toxamawao

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) tv.aa.dir p1.sg":
    tel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : ntela
    tel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : ntelaok
    ahel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : ntahela
    ahel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : ntahelaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) tv.aa.dir p1.sg":
    nachih<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nachiha
    nachih<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nachihaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    tel<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : ktela
    tel<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : ktelaok
    ahel<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : ktahela
    ahel<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : ktahelaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    nachih<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kenachiha
    nachih<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kenachihaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    tel<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : telao
    tel<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : telaok
    ahel<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : tohelao
    ahel<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : tohelaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    nachih<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : nachihao
    nachih<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : nachihaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    tel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : ntelawena 
    tel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : ntelawenak
    ahel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : ntahelawena
    ahel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : ntahelawenak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    nachih<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nachihawena 
    nachih<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nachihawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    tel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : ktelawena
    tel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : ktelawenak
    ahel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : ktahelawena
    ahel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : ktahelawenak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    nachih<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kenachihawena
    nachih<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kenachihawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    tel<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : ktelawa
    tel<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : ktelawaok
    ahel<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : ktahelawa
    ahel<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : ktahelawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    nachih<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kenachihawa
    nachih<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kenachihawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    nachihawao<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : telawoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch21) tv.aa.dir p1.sg":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : newichema
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : newichemaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) tv.aa.dir p1.sg":
    wixem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : newixena
    wixem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : newixenaok
    naol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : naola
    naol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : naolaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch21) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kewichema
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kewichemaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    wixem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kewixena
    wixem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kewixenaok
    naol<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : knaola
    naol<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : knaolaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch21) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : wichemao
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : wichemaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    wixem<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : wixenao
    wixem<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : wixenaok
    naol<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : naolao
    naol<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : naolaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch21) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : newichemawena   
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : newichemawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    wixem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : newixenawena  
    wixem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : newixenawenanak
    naol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : naolawena   
    naol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : naolawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch21) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kewichemawena
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kewichemawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    wixem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kewixenawena
    wixem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kewixenawenanak
    naol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : knaolawena
    naol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : knaolawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch21) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kewichemawa
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kewichemawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    wixem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kewixenawa
    wixem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kewixenawaok
    naol<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : knaolawa
    naol<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : knaolawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch21) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : wichemawao

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    wixem<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : wixenkuwoo
    naol<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : naolawao

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) tv.aa.dir p1.sg":
    uwah<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nuwaha
    uwah<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nuwahaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    uwah<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kuwaha
    uwah<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kuwahaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    uwah<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : uwahao
    uwah<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : uwahaok
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    uwah<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nuwahawena
    uwah<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nuwahawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    uwah<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kuwahawena
    uwah<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kuwahawenanak
